Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 7. Dissolution.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 910-918.

68 C.J.S., Partnership, §§ 610-613.

Sec. 32.11.370.
Dissolution.

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

at the time or upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement;

written consent of all partners;

an event of withdrawal of a general partner if there is no other general partner, and a majority in interest of the remaining partners fail to agree in writing within 90 days after the withdrawal to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment, effective as of the date of withdrawal, of one or more additional general partners; or

entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under AS

32.11.380

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 17 ch 87 SLA 1994; am § 18 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Section 24(b), ch. 78, SLA 1997 provides that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its certificate of limited partnership is amended on or after July 1, 1997, and states that the limited partnership is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 32.

Sec. 32.11.380.
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner, the superior court may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is impossible to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 19 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 24(b), ch. 78, SLA 1997 provides that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its certificate of limited partnership is amended on or after July 1, 1997, and states that the limited partnership is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 32.

Collateral references. —

Inability of partnership to operate at profit as justification for court-ordered dissolution. 20 ALR4th 122.

Sec. 32.11.390.
Winding up.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if there are no general partners, the limited partners, may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs; but the superior court may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs upon application of a partner, a partner’s legal representative, or assignee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.400.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

to creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under AS

32.11.240

or

32.11.270

;

except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under AS

32.11.240

or

32.11.270

; and

except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners first for the return of their contributions and secondly respecting their partnership interests, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this section, see AS 32.10 in the 1986 pamphlet and the 1992 supplement.

For applicability of the provisions of former AS 32.10 governing distribution of assets upon the winding up of a limited partnership formed before July 1, 1993, rather than this section, see § 3(c), ch. 128, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.